Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Article 4. Jurors' Employment

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

30 C.J.S. Employer - Employee § 79.

§ 1-11-401.
Protection of jurors' employment.

No employer shall discharge, threaten to discharge, intimidate or coerce any employee by reason of the employee’s jury service, for the attendance or scheduled attendance in connection with jury service, in any court in the state of Wyoming.

Any employer who violates the provisions of this section:

May be enjoined from further violations of this section in order to provide other appropriate relief, including but not limited to reinstatement; and

Is liable for exemplary damages to the employee in an amount set by the court, but not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for each violation as to each employee; and

Is liable for the employee’s reasonable costs and attorney’s fees, as set by the court, in enforcing his rights hereunder.

Any individual who is reinstated to a position of employment in accordance with this section shall be considered as having been on furlough or leave of absence during his period of jury service, shall be reinstated to his position of employment without loss of seniority and is entitled to participate in insurance or other benefits offered by the employer pursuant to established rules and practices relating to employees on furlough or on leave of absence in effect with the employer at the time the individual entered upon jury service.

No action by an employee aggrieved hereunder shall be brought more than six (6) months after the alleged violation.

The court may award a prevailing employer a reasonable attorney’s fee as part of the cost if the court determines that any action brought by an employee is frivolous, vexatious or brought in bad faith.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 138, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Jurors as within coverage of workers' compensation acts, 13 ALR5th 444.